new_hnd_mo/apertium_hn_in_canonical_form.dix
<pardef n="redio/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="geh/Uz__n">
<e><p><l>Uz</l><r>Uz<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Uz</l><r>Uz<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Uz</l><r>Uz<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uzoM</l><r>Uz<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="BARAvix/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="k/A__sh">
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="aham"><i>aham</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="arciRmAn"><i>arciRmAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="asaw"><i>asaw</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="avAk"><i>avAk</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="avixvAn"><i>avixvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="ayas"><i>ayas</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="BagavAn"><i>BagavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="BAgyavAn"><i>BAgyavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="balavAn"><i>balavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="balAw"><i>balAw</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="baNik"><i>baNik</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="bAno"><i>bAno</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="BARAvix"><i>BARAvix</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="BogavAn"><i>BogavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="bqhaw"><i>bqhaw</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="bqhax"><i>bqhax</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="brahmapariRax"><i>brahmapariRax</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="buxXimAn"><i>buxXimAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="CaH"><i>CaH</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="dipo"><i>dipo</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="gehUz"><i>geh</i><par n="geh/Uz__n"/></e>
<e lm="go"><i>go</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="hIro"><i>hIro</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="jagaw"><i>jagaw</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="KadAUz"><i>KadA</i><par n="geh/Uz__n"/></e>
<e lm="kA"><i>k</i><par n="k/A__sh"/></e>
<e lm="kiMciw"><i>kiMciw</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="koko"><i>koko</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="lakRmIvAn"><i>lakRmIvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="lIlAvAn"><i>lIlAvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="liMgavAn"><i>liMgavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mahawo"><i>mahawo</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mahAXanuR"><i>mahAXanuR</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mahimAvAn"><i>mahimAvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mAlyavAn"><i>mAlyavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="manwravix"><i>manwravix</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="marmavix"><i>marmavix</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mAwq"><i>mAwq</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mAyAvAn"><i>mAyAvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="meXAvAn"><i>meXAvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="nIgro"><i>nIgro</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="PalavAn"><i>PalavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="pariRax"><i>pariRax</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="Poto"><i>Poto</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="powavaNik"><i>powavaNik</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="pqWak"><i>pqWak</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="praBAvAn"><i>praBAvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="praBAvavAn"><i>praBAvavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prAcyavix"><i>prAcyavix</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prajFAvAn"><i>prajFAvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="pramAxavAn"><i>pramAxavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prANavAn"><i>prANavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prawibanXavAn"><i>prawibanXavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prawiBAvAn"><i>prawiBAvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prawiRTAvAn"><i>prawiRTAvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prayawnavAn"><i>prayawnavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prayojanavAn"><i>prayojanavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prekRAvAn"><i>prekRAvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="q"><i>q</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="rAmaXanuR"><i>rAmaXanuR</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="rasavAn"><i>rasavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="rAso"><i>rAso</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="raWavAn"><i>raWavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="redio"><i>redio</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="rediyo"><i>rediyo</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="saBAsax"><i>saBAsax</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="Sakrajiw"><i>Sakrajiw</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="saMskAravAn"><i>saMskAravAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="saMvaw"><i>saMvaw</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="san"><i>san</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="saw"><i>saw</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sax"><i>sax</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="SiKAvAn"><i>SiKAvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="SikRAvix"><i>SikRAvix</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="So"><i>So</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="SqfgavAn"><i>SqfgavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="SraxXAvAn"><i>SraxXAvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="stUdiyo"><i>stUdiyo</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="vicAravAn"><i>vicAravAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="vijiwavAn"><i>vijiwavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="virAt"><i>virAt</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="vix"><i>vix</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="vixyuw"><i>vixyuw</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="vqhaw"><i>vqhaw</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="wamas"><i>wamas</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="waw"><i>waw</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="xaNdavaw"><i>xaNdavaw</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="yUnesko"><i>yUnesko</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
